Utah statutes.
53A-13-301.   Application of state and federal law to the administration and operation of public schools.

(1)  Employees and agents of the state's public education system shall protect the privacy of students, their parents, and their families, and support parental involvement in the education of their children through compliance with the protections provided for family and student privacy under Section 53A-13-302 and the Federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act and related provisions under 20 U.S.C. 1232 (g) and (h), in the administration and operation of all public school programs, regardless of the source of funding.

(2)  Each public school district shall enact policies governing the protection of family and student privacy as required by this section.

